Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Article 11. Construction of Chapter.

§ 33.2-1935.
Liberal construction.

This chapter, being necessary for the welfare of the Commonwealth and its inhabitants, shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes thereof.

History.

1964, c. 631, § 15.1-1372; 1997, c. 587, § 15.1-4534; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1936.
Transportation districts with unique needs.

The General Assembly finds that transportation districts that (i) have a population of 1.7 million or more, as shown by the most recent United States Census, (ii) have not less than 1.5 million motor vehicles registered therein, and (iii) have a total transit ridership of not less than 75 million riders per year across all transit systems within the transportation district and in which a rapid heavy rail commuter mass transportation system operating on an exclusive right-of-way and a bus commuter mass transportation system are owned, operated, or controlled by an agency or commission as defined in §

33.2-1901

have unique transportation needs.

History.

2018, cc. 854, 856.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, cc. 854 and 856, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act, except for §§

33.2-214.4

,

33.2-286

, and

33.2-1526.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

58.1-638

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall not become effective until 30 days after the District of Columbia and the State of Maryland each enact legislation or take actions to provide dedicated funding for the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority (WMATA). The percentage of funding provided by the Commonwealth for its share of WMATA funding pursuant to this act beginning with the fiscal year that this act becomes effective, and each fiscal year thereafter, shall be proportional to the amount of funding provided by the District of Columbia and Maryland relative to their respective share of WMATA funding in that fiscal year.” The Virginia Code Commission has advised that the contingency occurred April 25, 2018,
and the effective date is therefore May 25, 2018.